Massachusetts, session 194th, H1818.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following new section: 
Section 9A.  Orders Protecting Minors.  Any on behalf of order or order relative to minor 
children, remains in effect after the minor reaches the age of majority unless otherwise ordered 
by the court. Upon reaching the age of majority, the plaintiff may appear at court on the date and 
time the order is to expire, and the court shall determine whether or not to extend the order for 
any additional time reasonably necessary to protect the plaintiff or to enter a permanent order. 
Chapter 258E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by adding the following new section: 
Section 11A.  Orders Protecting Minors.  Any order issued on behalf of a minor remains 
in effect after the minor reaches the majority unless otherwise ordered by the court. Upon 
reaching the age of majority, the plaintiff may appear at court on the date and time the order is to 

of 2 13 expire, and the court shall determine whether or not to extend the order for any additional time 
reasonably necessary to protect the plaintiff or to enter a permanent order.